apertium-umu.umu.lexd
LEXICON Animate-N-Stems
pámbiil:pa{'}mbi{'}il             # "book"
moonáhkeew:moona{'}hke{'}ew       # "groundhog"
pootaatíikan:pootaat{i}ikan   # "horn"
óohŭm:oohum                 # "grandmother"
moxóomus:moxoom{u}s           # "grandfather"
míhtukw:miht{u}kw                    # "tree"
oxkwéesus:oxkweesus            # "girl"
pehpáxkwuleesh:pehpaxkwuleesh     # "flower"
kóon:koon                      # "snow"
níhkash:nihkash                # "fingernail"
kóowuy:koowuy                  # "cow"
kóoshkoosh:kooshkoosh          # "pig"
atóh:atoh                      # "deer"
nzhíis:nzhiis                  # "uncle"
amiimunz:amiimunz              # "child"
amóxool:amoxool                # "boat"
ngúk:nguk                      # "my mother" (OBLIGATORY POSSESSIVE)
meexalapóotiis:meexalapóotiis  # "spider"
néenaxkw:néenaxkw              # "ball"
máxkw:maxkw                    # "bear"
óhpun:o{'}hpun                    # "potato"
mwáakaneew:mwaakaneew          # "dog"
kíishooxkw:kíishooxkw          # "sun"
niipáahum:niipáahum            # "moon"

# ISSUE: WHAT TO DO WITH MANDATORY POSSESSIVES?

LEXICON Inanimate-N-Stems # how t{n}use"
mbúy:mbu{y}                         # "water"
áanay:aana{y}                 # "road"
síipuw:siipu{w}               # "river"
wtéehiim:wteehiim                  # "strawberry"
áhpapoon:ahpapoon           # "chair"
máhksun:mahksun                 # "shoe"
máhkahkw:mahkahkw               # "pumpkin"
kpahoon:kpahoon                 # "door"
wchápihk:wchapihk               # "medicine"
mataawsuwáakan:mataawsuwaakan   # "sin"
ahkuy:ahkuy                     # "earth"
kóot:koot                     # "coat"
túndeew:tundeew                 # "fire"
níil:niil                   # "my head"
paxkshíikan:paxkshiikan     # "knife"
náxk:náxk                   # "hand"
asún:asun                   # "rock"
hulŭniixsuwáakan:hulŭniixsuwáakan   # "Munsee"
matantoowiineng:matantoowiineng     # "hell"
pépul:pepul                 # "pepper"
puyool:puyool              # "violin"

LEXICON Intransitive-Inanimate-V-Stems
wíinee:wiinee         # "snow"
páasii:paasii          # "swell"
wŭlút:w{ŭ}lu{'}t            # "be nice, good"
áhteew:ahteew          # "be there"
máxkee:ma{'}xke{'}e        # "be red"
lúngteew:lungteew      # "melt"
kshúteew:kshúteew      # "be hot"
kuliikwaasuw:kuliikwaasuw # "sewn"
chahkwéeshuw:chahkweeshuw   # "be short"
# what about starting consonants that contract with prefixes?

LEXICON Intransitive-Animate-V-Stems
kawíi:ka{'}wi{'}i              # "sleep"
alóhkee:alo{'}hk{e}e           # "work"
mataawsu:mataawsu         # "lead a wicked life, sin"
shiinzuw:shiinzuw          # "be named"
kulooneew:kulooneew         # "lie"
wulaawsuw:wulaawsuw         # "be holy"
manoongsuw:manoongsuw       # "be angry"
ehkwi-pumaawsuw:ehkwi-pumaawsuw # "die"
manihleew:manihleew         # "die"
liitéeheew:liiteeheew       # "think"
uw:uw                 # "say"
alúmsuw:alumsuw              # "leave, go off"
lpákw:lpakw              # "cry"
apii:ap{I}{I}             # "be there"
máxksuw:máxksuw         # "be red with cold"
shungíixiin:shungi{'}ixiin     # "lie down"
níimaa:ni{'}im{a}{'}a          # "bring lunch"
ndúpuw:ndupuw           # "cook"
naxkóohŭmeew:naxkóohŭmeew       # "sing"
sŭluskóonzheew:sŭlusko{'}onzheew   # "have many children"
tŭmushíikee:tŭmu{'}shi{'}ikee       # "cut the grass"
saaláakhe:saalaakhe             # "cut logs"
kaatxákhwe:kaatxakhwe           # "cut cordwood"
piinjiipáhtoo:piinjiipáhtoo   # "hurry inside"
kúndkee:ku{'}ndkee               # "dance"
pŭmáashŭwihl:pumaashuwihl       # "swim"
píilsuw:piilsuw                 # "be clean"
alakweelúndam:alakweelundam     # "be sorry"
pumúsuw:pumusuw                 # "walk"

LEXICON Transitive-Inanimate-V-Stems
néem:ne{'}em                   # "see"
míichii:mi{'}ich{I}{'}{I}             # "eat"
katáatam:k{ʍ}ata{'}atam        # "want"
pundam:pundam               # "hear"
kpáham:k{ʍ}{ù}p{a}{'}ha{'}m               # "shut, close"
péetoo:pe{'}et{O}o              # "bring"
tawúnum:tawúnum             # "open"
kwutúmun:kwutumun           # "feel for"
kŭlústam:kulustam           # "listen"
kwíilam:kwiilam             # "look for (something)"
pŭmutáachiind:pumutaachiind # "drag something along"
peettáachiind:peettáachiind # "drag to here"
lóngwaam:longwaam           # "dream about something"
mŭláam:mulaam               # "smell something"
wund:wund                   # "get from somewhere"
ktáam:ktaam                 # "eat up"
mŭnée:mu{'}ne{'}e               # "drink"
msháatam:mshaatam           # "remember"
wulàmalúsuw:wulàmalúsuw     # "feel well"
lŭnúm:lŭnu{'}m              # "do"
wihkwíhlee:wihkwihl{AE}{AE}     # "run out"
kxánuw:{K}xa{'}n{I}{I}                   # "have"

LEXICON Transitive-Animate-V-Stems
néewaa:ne{'}ew{AE}{AE}                  # "see"
katáaleew:kataalee{w}          # "want someone"
kumootkeew:kumootkeew   # "steal"
ahwaaleew:ahwaaleew     # "love"
ngaleew:ngaleew         # "leave behind"
tumusheew:tumusheew     # "cut"
leew:leew               # "tell"
wiinamámeew:wiinamameew     # "hurt, be sore in"
wunjíimeew:wunjíimeew   # "call, summon"
wŭlustáweew:wulustaweew     # "believe"
takwapŭwáleew:takwapuwaleew # "marry"
leekhámaweew:leekhámaweew   # "write"
mŭtáanheew:mutaanheew       # "bewitch, influence"
móxkaweew:moxkaweew         # "find"

LEXICON Adjective-Stems
waapii:waapii           # "white"
wiisaawii:wiisaawii     # "yellow"
maxkii:maxkii           # "red"
nzukii:nzukii           # "black"
chiipii:chiipii         # "terrible"

PATTERN Adjectives 
Adjective-Stems [<adj>:]

LEXICON Pronoun-Stems
aween:aween         # "person"
kweekw:kweekw       # "thing"
ktakan:ktakan       # "the other"

LEXICON Adverb-Stems
laawate:laawate     # "long ago"
moxa:moxa           # "very"
nal:nal             # "then"
shaa:~shaa          # "immediately" NEEDS A TWOL RULE  Dir/RL
shaa:shaa           # "immediately" Dir/LR
shaa:shaaw          # "immediately" Dir/LR
alaami:alaami       # "inside" PREPOSITION
mehch:mehch         # "now"
ngumee:ngumee       # "always"
njihnal:njihnal     # "more"
kway:kway           # "now"
máash:maash         # "like, as if"
msúchee:msúchee     # "hardly, at all"
kehla:kehla         # "really"
aashtee:aashtee     # "instead, next, then"
piht:piht           # "maybe"
peech:peech         # "here"
taas:taas           # "one time"
ngwutun:ngwutun     # "once"
njihnal:njihnal     # "more"
mah:mah             # "no, not, negative"
péhkiik:pehkiik     # "eventually, reluctantly"
nxoo:nxoo           # "alone"

PATTERN Adverbs
Adverb-Stems [<adv>:]

LEXICON Coordinating-Conjunctions
waak:waak    # "and"
shukw:shukw # "but"

PATTERN Coord-Conj
Coordinating-Conjunctions [<cnjcoo>:]

#LEXICON Subordinating-Conjunctions

#PATTERN Sub-Conj
#Subordinating-Conjunctions [<subcoo>:]

LEXICON Emphatic-Stems
ang:ang             # Emphatic
há:ha               # Emphatic

PATTERN Emphatics
Emphatic-Stems [<emph>:]
[há<qst>:ha]

LEXICON Interjection
kwaachund:kwaachund     # "goodness!"

PATTERN Interjections
Interjection [<ij>:]

LEXICON Modals
uch:uch             # "will"; future modal word

PATTERN Modal-Words
Modals [<mod>:]

LEXICON Animate-Demonstratives(2)
ya:ya <sg>:           # "this"
wa:wa <sg>:           # "this"
wan:wan <sg>:          # "this"
yook:yook <pl>:     # "these"
na:na <sg>:         # "that"
nan:nan <sg>:       # "that"
niik:niik <pl>:     # "those"

LEXICON Inanimate-Demonstratives(2)
yu:yu <sg>:      # "this"
yoon:yoon <sg>:   # "this"
yool:yool <pl>:     # "these"
nu:nu <sg>:   # "that"
nun:nun <sg>:   # "that"
níil:níil <pl>:     # "those"

PATTERN Demonstratives
Animate-Demonstratives(1) [<det><dem><aa>:] Animate-Demonstratives(2)
Inanimate-Demonstratives(1) [<det><dem><nn>:] Inanimate-Demonstratives(2)
Animate-Demonstratives(1) [<prn><dem><aa>:] Animate-Demonstratives(2)
Inanimate-Demonstratives(1) [<prn><dem><nn>:] Inanimate-Demonstratives(2)

LEXICON Determiners
weemĭ:weemĭ         # "all"

PATTERN Determiner
Determiners [<det>:]

LEXICON Proper-Nouns(2)
Noah:Noah <ant>:                      # "Noah"
Pahtamawaas:Pahtamawaas <ant>:        # "God"
Jesus:Jesus <ant>:                    # "Jesus"
Christ:Christ <ant>:                   # "Christ"
Máaliish:Máaliish <ant>:              # "Molly"
Méeliish:Méeliish <ant>:              # "Mary"

PATTERN Number
Numeral [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
/([0123456789])+/
/([0123456789])+[.,]([0123456789])+/
ngwut:ngwut         # "one"
níisha:niisha       # "two"
nxáh:nxah           # "three"
néewa:neewa         # "four"
náalan:náalan       # "five"

LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
